Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-775
Purpose of act; Center for Student Leadership and Expanded Learning; duties.

The purpose of the Center for Student Leadership and Expanded Learning Act is to provide state support for establishing and maintaining within the State Department of Education the Center for Student Leadership and Expanded Learning. The center shall provide ongoing financial and administrative support for state leadership and administration of Nebraska career education student organizations, create and coordinate opportunities for students to participate in educational activities outside the normal classroom, and partner with state and local organizations to share research and identify best practices that can be disseminated to schools and community organizations.

Laws 2009, LB476, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 12.